Nevada, session 83, AB487.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. Chapter 574 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto the provisions set forth as sections 2 and 3 of this act.
Sec. 2. 1. A retail pet store shall not sell, offer to sell,
barter, auction or otherwise transfer ownership of any dog or cat.
2. Nothing in this section shall be construed to prohibit a
retail pet store from collaborating with an animal shelter or
animal rescue organization for the purpose of adoption to provide
space to showcase dogs or cats under the care of the animal
shelter or animal rescue organization. A retail pet store that
provides space to an animal shelter or animal rescue organization
in such a manner must not receive any compensation for
showcasing the dog or cat or any portion of the fees that result
from the adoption of the dog or cat.
3. An operator of a retail pet store that violates the provisions
of this section is guilty of a misdemeanor.
4. For the purposes of prosecuting a violation of this section,
each act that constitutes a violation of this section is a separate
offense. In addition to any other penalty that may be imposed, the
court may prohibit a person who is guilty of a misdemeanor
pursuant to subsection 3 from selling any dogs or cats that he or
she is otherwise authorized to sell as a breeder or dealer, if
applicable, pursuant to the provisions of this chapter for not more
than 1 year.
5. As used in this section, “animal rescue organization” has
the meaning ascribed to it in NRS 574.205. The term does not
include a dealer, a breeder or any organization that is located on
the premises of or shares employees with a breeder.
Sec. 3. (Deleted by amendment.)
-
*AB487_R1*

– 3 –
Sec. 4. NRS 574.210 is hereby amended to read as follows:
574.210 As used in NRS 574.210 to 574.510, inclusive, and
section 2 of this act, unless the context otherwise requires, the
words and terms defined in NRS 574.220 to 574.330, inclusive,
have the meanings ascribed to them in those sections.
Sec. 5. NRS 574.250 is hereby amended to read as follows:
574.250 “Cattery” means a place where at least 10 cats of not
less than 6 months of age are kept, harbored or maintained for:
1. Boarding;
2. Training; or
3. Breeding for sale to a [retailer or] dealer.
 For the purposes of this section, spayed or neutered cats must not
be counted when determining the number of cats that are being kept,
harbored or maintained.
Sec. 6. NRS 574.260 is hereby amended to read as follows:
574.260 “Dealer” means a person who, for compensation or
profit, buys, sells, breeds, trades or imports cats or dogs for resale.
The term does not include a retail pet store.
Sec. 7. NRS 574.280 is hereby amended to read as follows:
574.280 “Kennel” means a place where at least 10 dogs of not
less than 6 months of age are kept, harbored or maintained for:
1. Boarding;
2. Training; or
3. Breeding for sale to a [retailer or] dealer.
 For the purposes of this section, spayed or neutered dogs, dogs
used by or being trained for use by the Armed Forces, police
officers, search and rescue teams or other similar organizations,
dogs used in farming or ranching, and dogs used by or being trained
for use by persons with disabilities, including, but not limited to,
dogs used to assist persons in wheelchairs, must not be counted
when determining the number of dogs that are being kept, harbored
or maintained.
Sec. 7.5. NRS 574.290 is hereby amended to read as follows:
574.290 “Operator” means a person responsible for the
operation of:
1. A cattery, kennel , retail pet store or commercial
establishment engaged in the business of selling animals; or
2. An animal shelter.
Sec. 8. NRS 574.320 is hereby amended to read as follows:
574.320 [“Retailer”] “Retail pet store” means a [person who
acquires pets] commercial establishment engaged in the business
of acquiring animals for resale [.] that sells or offers to sell such
animals to consumers on the premises of the business.
-
*AB487_R1*

– 4 –
Sec. 9. NRS 574.340 is hereby amended to read as follows:
574.340 1. The provisions of NRS 574.210 to 574.510,
inclusive, and section 2 of this act do not apply to:
(a) The exhibition, production, marketing or disposal of any
livestock, poultry, fish or other agricultural commodity or animal.
(b) Activities for which a license is required by the provisions of
chapter 466 of NRS.
(c) The housing of domestic cats or dogs kept as pets or cared
for, without remuneration other than payment for reasonable
expenses relating to the care of the cats or dogs, on behalf of another
person in a home environment.
(d) The exhibition of dogs or cats.
2. As used in this section:
(a) “Animal” has the meaning ascribed to it in NRS 564.010.
(b) “Livestock” has the meaning ascribed to it in NRS 569.0085.
Sec. 10. NRS 574.450 is hereby amended to read as follows:
574.450 1. A [retailer or] dealer shall, after the acquisition of
a cat or dog for resale, cause the cat or dog to be examined by a
veterinarian. The [retailer or] dealer shall not sell the cat or dog
before it is initially examined by a veterinarian.
2. A [retailer or] dealer shall cause a cat or dog acquired for
resale to be reexamined by a veterinarian:
(a) Fourteen days after the date of its initial examination; and
(b) Every 30 days thereafter until sold.
3. If a veterinarian conducting an examination pursuant to this
section finds that the cat or dog has no illness, disease or other
condition that is terminal or requires immediate hospitalization or
immediate surgical intervention, the veterinarian shall provide a
written statement setting forth his or her findings to the [retailer or]
dealer.
4. A [retailer or] dealer shall not knowingly sell a cat or dog if
it has an illness, disease or other condition that is terminal or
requires immediate hospitalization or immediate surgical
intervention.
5. For the purposes of this section, the presence of internal or
external parasites does not constitute an illness, disease or other
condition that is terminal or requires immediate hospitalization or
immediate surgical intervention unless the cat or dog is clinically ill
as a result of the parasite.
Sec. 11. NRS 574.460 is hereby amended to read as follows:
574.460 1. A [retailer or] dealer shall, before selling a cat,
provide the purchaser of the cat with a written statement that
discloses:
(a) The name, address and telephone number of the [retailer or]
dealer.
-
*AB487_R1*

– 5 –
(b) The date the cat was born, if known.
(c) The name and address of the person from whom the [retailer
or] dealer obtained the cat and, if the person holds a license issued
by the United States Department of Agriculture, the person’s federal
identification number.
(d) The name and address of the breeder of the cat and, if the
breeder holds a license issued by the United States Department of
Agriculture, the breeder’s federal identification number.
(e) The registration numbers, if any, of the cat’s sire and dam
with the appropriate breed registry or any health certifications from
a health certification organization such as the Orthopedic
Foundation for Animals or its successor organization, if any.
(f) A record of any immunizations administered to the cat before
the time of sale, including the type of vaccine, date of administration
and name and address of the veterinarian who prescribed the
vaccine.
(g) Any sterilization requirements for the cat required by local
ordinance.
(h) The medical history of the cat, including, without limitation:
(1) The date that a veterinarian examined and, if applicable,
reexamined the cat pursuant to subsections 1 and 2 of NRS 574.450
and determined that the cat did not have any illness, disease or other
condition that is terminal or requires immediate hospitalization or
immediate surgical intervention. For the purposes of this
subparagraph, the presence of internal or external parasites does not
constitute an illness, disease or other condition that is terminal or
requires immediate hospitalization or immediate surgical
intervention, unless the cat is clinically ill as a result of the parasite.
(2) Whether any treatment or medication has been
administered by the veterinarian who examined or, if applicable,
reexamined the cat pursuant to subsections 1 and 2 of NRS 574.450
and if such treatment or medication was administered, a statement
indicating on what date it was administered and for what illness,
disease or condition.
(3) The date on which the veterinarian sterilized the cat, if
applicable.
(4) The name and address of the veterinarian who performed
the examinations, reexaminations or sterilization or administered
any treatments or medications.
(i) That a copy of the veterinarian’s evaluation of the health of
the cat made pursuant to NRS 574.450 is available to the purchaser.
2. The written statement must be signed and dated by the
[retailer or] dealer and contain a space for the purchaser to sign and
date the statement as an attestation that the purchaser has read and
understands the disclosures contained in the statement.
-
*AB487_R1*

– 6 –
Sec. 12. NRS 574.470 is hereby amended to read as follows:
574.470 1. A [retailer or] dealer shall, before selling a dog,
provide the purchaser of the dog with a written statement that
discloses:
(a) The name, address and telephone number of the [retailer or]
dealer.
(b) The date the dog was born, if known.
(c) The name and address of the person from whom the [retailer
or] dealer obtained the dog and, if the person holds a license issued
by the United States Department of Agriculture, the person’s federal
identification number.
(d) The name and address of the breeder of the dog and, if the
breeder holds a license issued by the United States Department of
Agriculture, the breeder’s federal identification number.
(e) The registration numbers, if any, of the dog’s sire and dam
with the appropriate breed registry or any health certificates from a
health certification organization such as the Orthopedic Foundation
for Animals or its successor organization, if any.
(f) A record of any immunizations administered to the dog
before the time of sale, including the type of vaccine, date of
administration and name and address of the veterinarian who
prescribed the vaccine.
(g) Any sterilization requirements for the dog required by local
ordinance.
(h) The medical history of the dog, including, without
limitation:
(1) The date that a veterinarian examined and, if applicable,
reexamined the dog pursuant to subsections 1 and 2 of NRS 574.450
and determined that the dog did not have any illness, disease or
other condition that is terminal or requires immediate hospitalization
or immediate surgical intervention. For the purposes of this
subparagraph, the presence of internal or external parasites does not
constitute an illness, disease or other condition that is terminal or
requires immediate hospitalization or immediate surgical
intervention, unless the dog is clinically ill as a result of the parasite.
(2) Whether any treatment or medication has been
administered by the veterinarian who examined or, if applicable,
reexamined the dog pursuant to subsections 1 and 2 of NRS 574.450
and, if such treatment or medication was administered, a statement
indicating on what date it was administered and for what illness,
disease or condition.
(3) The date on which the veterinarian sterilized the dog, if
applicable.
-
*AB487_R1*

– 7 –
(4) The name and address of the veterinarian who performed
the examinations, reexaminations or sterilization or administered
any treatments or medications.
(i) That a copy of the veterinarian’s evaluation of the health of
the dog performed pursuant to NRS 574.450 is available to the
purchaser.
2. The written statement must be signed and dated by the
[retailer or] dealer and contain a space for the purchaser to sign and
date the statement as an attestation that the purchaser has read and
understands the disclosures contained in the statement.
Sec. 13. NRS 574.480 is hereby amended to read as follows:
574.480 A [retailer or] dealer shall conspicuously post within
close proximity to the primary enclosure of a dog or cat offered for
sale the following notice printed in at least 48-point type upon paper
that is at least 11 inches wide and 17 inches long:

NEVADA LAW REQUIRES THAT INFORMATION
CONCERNING THE DATE OF BIRTH, SOURCE,
LINEAGE AND MEDICAL HISTORY OF THESE DOGS
(OR CATS) BE PROVIDED TO THE PURCHASER
BEFORE THE COMPLETION OF ANY SALE.
Sec. 14. NRS 574.485 is hereby amended to read as follows:
574.485 1. In addition to any other penalty provided by law,
the Director of the State Department of Agriculture may impose an
administrative fine on any [retailer or] dealer who violates the
provisions of NRS 574.460, 574.470 or 574.480 in an amount not to
exceed:

For the first violation ........................................................ $250
For the second violation ..................................................... 500
For each subsequent violation ......................................... 1,000

2. All fines collected by the Director pursuant to subsection 1
must be deposited with the State Treasurer for credit to the State
General Fund.
Sec. 15. NRS 574.490 is hereby amended to read as follows:
574.490 If a person purchases a [pet] dog or cat from a [retailer
or] dealer and, within 10 days after the sale, a veterinarian
determines that the [pet] dog or cat has an illness, disease or other
condition that is terminal or requires immediate hospitalization or
immediate surgical intervention and that was in existence on the
date of the sale, the [retailer or] dealer shall, at the option of the
purchaser, either:
-
*AB487_R1*

– 8 –
1. Refund the purchase price of the [pet] dog or cat if the [pet]
dog or cat is returned or provide the purchaser with another [pet]
dog or cat of equal value; or
2. Reimburse the purchaser, in an amount not to exceed the
purchase price of the [pet,] dog or cat, for expenses incurred by the
purchaser in obtaining a diagnosis and treatment for the [pet] dog or
cat from a veterinarian chosen by the [retailer or] dealer.
Sec. 16. NRS 574.500 is hereby amended to read as follows:
574.500 1. A [retailer,] dealer or operator shall not separate a
dog or cat from its mother until it is 8 weeks of age or accustomed
to taking food or nourishment other than by nursing, whichever is
later.
2. A person who violates the provisions of this section is guilty
of a misdemeanor.
Sec. 17. NRS 574.510 is hereby amended to read as follows:
574.510 1. A [retailer or] dealer who sells a dog or cat that
the [retailer or] dealer knows has any illness, disease or other
condition that is terminal or requires immediate hospitalization or
immediate surgical intervention and fails to disclose such
information at the time of sale is guilty of a misdemeanor. In
addition to any other penalty that may be imposed, the court may
prohibit a person convicted of a violation of this section from selling
any dogs or cats for not more than 1 year.
2. For the purposes of this section, the presence of internal or
external parasites does not constitute an illness, disease or other
condition that is terminal or requires immediate hospitalization or
immediate surgical intervention unless the dog or cat is clinically ill
as a result of the parasite.
Sec. 18. NRS 574.550 is hereby amended to read as follows:
574.550 1. Except as otherwise provided in subsections 2 and
3, a person who sells or attempts to sell, offers for adoption or
transfers ownership of a live animal at a swap meet is guilty of a
misdemeanor.
2. A person may sell, attempt to sell, offer for adoption or
transfer ownership of a live animal other than a dog or cat or dog at
a swap meet if:
(a) The swap meet is conducted in a county or incorporated city
in this State that has adopted an ordinance authorizing the sale of
live animals at a swap meet;
(b) The person sells, attempts to sell, offers for adoption or
transfers ownership of the animal in accordance with the ordinance;
and
(c) The ordinance, at a minimum:
-
*AB487_R1*

– 9 –
(1) Includes provisions which are substantially similar to the
provisions of NRS 574.360 to 574.510, inclusive, and section 2 of
this act and are applicable to all animals offered for sale and all
persons who sell, attempt to sell, offer for adoption or transfer
ownership of an animal at the swap meet; and
(2) Does not authorize a person to commit an act of cruelty
to an animal in violation of NRS 574.050 to 574.200, inclusive.
3. The provisions of this section do not:
(a) Apply to any sale or transfer of ownership of any livestock.
(b) Apply to any event where the primary purpose is to sell or
auction livestock or agricultural implements.
(c) Apply to any adoption of a dog or cat at an event held
outdoors by an animal shelter or rescue organization that is
recognized as exempt under section 501(c)(3) of the Internal
Revenue Code, 26 U.S.C. § 501(c)(3).
(d) Apply to a person who offers for adoption or transfers
ownership of a live animal at a swap meet if:
(1) A fee is not charged or collected for the adoption or
transfer of ownership or otherwise in connection with the
transaction; and
(2) The animal has had all the required vaccinations which
are appropriate based upon the age of the animal.
(e) Exempt a person from complying with:
(1) Any requirement to obtain a license or other authorization
to engage in a business in a county or incorporated city in this State;
or
(2) Any other requirement of the county or incorporated city
to engage in business or to sell, attempt to sell, offer for adoption or
transfer ownership of a live animal at a swap meet.
4. As used in this section:
(a) “Livestock” has the meaning ascribed to it in NRS 569.0085.
(b) “Sell” means to barter, exchange, sell, trade, offer for sale,
expose for sale, have in possession for sale, arrange the sale of or
solicit for sale.
(c) “Swap meet” means a flea market, open-air market or other
organized event at which two or more persons offer merchandise for
sale or exchange.
Sec. 19. NRS 574.300 is hereby repealed.
Sec. 20. This act becomes effective on January 1, 2026.
-
*AB487_R1*

– 10 –
TEXT OF REPEALED SECTION
574.300 “Pet” defined. “Pet” means a domestic cat or dog
commonly kept for pleasure.
H
-
*AB487_R1*